Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 2. TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE

SUBTITLE B. DISCIPLINE AND ENFORCEMENT

CHAPTER 85. GENERAL CRIMINAL ENFORCEMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 85.001. VIOLATION OF CERTAIN LAWS FOR WHICH PUNISHMENT IS NOT PROVIDED; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a law of this state regulating the business of life, fire, or marine insurance.

(b) Unless another penalty is provided by law, an offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $500 or more than $1,000.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROSECUTION OF OFFENSES

Sec. 85.051. VENUE FOR PROSECUTION. (a) A person who violates the Penal Code or a penal provision of this code while engaged in the business of insurance may be prosecuted in:

(1) Travis County; or

(2) a county in which prosecution is authorized under the Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) A law limiting regulation by the department under this code or another insurance law of this state does not restrict the application of this section.

(c) This section controls if there is a conflict or ambiguity between this section and another provision of this code or another insurance law of this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 85.052. ELECTION OF PROSECUTION. A person who commits an offense under this code may be prosecuted under this code or any other law of this state under which the person may be prosecuted.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 101, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.